California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.   (AB 121)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

697.520.

A judgment lien on personal property may be created pursuant to this article as an alternative or in addition to a lien created by levy under a writ of execution pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 699.010) or by use of an enforcement procedure provided by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 708.010).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

697.530.

(a) A judgment lien on personal property is a lien on all interests in the following personal property that are subject to enforcement of the money judgment against the judgment debtor pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 695.010) of Chapter 1 at the time when the lien is created if the personal property is, at that time, any of the following:

(1) Accounts receivable, and the judgment debtor is located in this state.

(2) Chattel paper, as defined in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code, and the judgment debtor is located in this state.

(3) Equipment, located within this state.

(4) Farm products, located within this state.

(5) Inventory, located within this state.

(6) Negotiable documents of title, located within this state.

(b) If any interest in personal property on which a judgment lien could be created under subdivision (a) is acquired after the judgment lien was created, the judgment lien attaches to the interest at the time it is acquired.

(c) To the extent provided by Section 697.620, a judgment lien on personal property continues on the proceeds received upon the sale, collection, or other disposition of the property subject to the judgment lien.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
 section, the judgment lien does not attach to:

(1) A vehicle or vessel required to be registered with the Department of Motor Vehicles or a mobilehome or commercial coach required to be registered pursuant to the Health and Safety Code.

(2) As-extracted collateral, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code, and timber to be cut.

(3) The inventory of a retail merchant held for sale except to the extent that the inventory of the retail merchant consists of durable goods having a unit retail value of at least five hundred dollars ($500). For the purposes of this paragraph, “retail merchant” does not include either of the following:

(A) A person whose sales for resale exceeded 75 percent in dollar volume of the
 person’s total sales of all goods during the 12 months preceding the filing of the notice of judgment lien on personal property.

(B) A cooperative association organized pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 20 of the Food and Agricultural Code (agricultural cooperative associations) or Part 3 (commencing with Section 13200) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code (Fish Marketing Act).

(e) If property subject to a lien under this article becomes a fixture, as defined in paragraph (41) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code, the judgment lien on that property is extinguished.

(f) Notwithstanding the filing of a notice of judgment lien, subject to the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 708.010), a person obligated on an account receivable or chattel
 paper is authorized to pay or compromise the amount without notice to or consent of the judgment creditor unless and until there is a levy pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 699.010).

(g) For purposes of this section, whether a person is located in this state is determined in accordance with Section 9307 of the Commercial Code, except that the location of a registered organization, as defined in paragraph (71) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code, that is organized under the law of another state is determined without regard to subdivision (e) of Section 9307 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 200, Sec. 9.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

697.540.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, a judgment lien on personal property is a lien for the amount required to satisfy the money judgment.

(b) A judgment lien on personal property created under a money judgment payable in installments pursuant to Section 117 or 582.5 of this code or pursuant to Section 16380 of the Vehicle Code is in the full amount required to satisfy the judgment, but the judgment lien may not be enforced for the amount of unmatured
 installments unless the court so orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 92.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

697.550.

The notice of judgment lien on personal property shall be executed under oath by the judgment creditor’s attorney if the judgment creditor has an attorney of record or, if the judgment creditor does not have an attorney of record, by the judgment creditor and shall contain the following information:

(a) The name and mailing address of the judgment creditor.

(b) The name and last known mailing address of the judgment debtor.

(c) A statement that: “All
 property subject to enforcement of a money judgment against the judgment debtor to which a judgment lien on personal property may attach under Section 697.530 of the Code of Civil Procedure is subject to this judgment lien.”

(d) The title of the court where the judgment is entered and the cause and number of the action.

(e) The date of entry of the judgment and of any subsequent renewals and where entered in the records of the court.

(f) The amount required to satisfy the judgment at the date of the notice.

(g) The date of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

697.560.

At the time of filing the notice of judgment lien on personal property or promptly thereafter, the judgment creditor shall serve a copy of the notice of judgment lien on the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail. The failure to comply with this requirement does not affect the validity of the judgment lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

697.570.

Upon presentation of a notice of judgment lien on personal property for filing and tender of the filing fee to the office of the Secretary of State, the notice of judgment lien shall be filed, marked, and indexed in the same manner as a financing statement. The fee for filing in the office of the Secretary of State is the same as the fee for filing a financing statement in the standard form. A notice shall not be filed if it is presented for filing more than 10 days after the date of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

697.580.

(a) Upon the request of any person, the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate showing whether there is on file in that office on the date and hour stated therein any notice of judgment lien on personal property filed against the property of a particular person named in the request. If a notice of judgment lien is on file, the certificate shall state the date and hour of filing of each such notice and any notice affecting any such notice of judgment lien and the name and address of the judgment
 creditor.

(b) Upon request, the Secretary of State shall furnish a copy of any notice of judgment lien or notice affecting a notice of judgment lien. The certificate shall be issued as part of a combined certificate pursuant to Section 9528 of the Commercial Code, and the fee for the certificate and copies shall be in accordance with that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 17.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

697.590.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Filing” means:

(A) With respect to a judgment lien on personal property, the filing of a notice of judgment lien in the office of the Secretary of State to create a judgment lien on personal property under this article.

(B) With respect to a security interest or agricultural lien, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code, the filing of a financing statement pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code.

(2) “Perfection” means perfection of a security interest or agricultural lien pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code.

(3) “Personal property” means:

(A) With respect to a judgment lien on personal property, the property to which a judgment lien has attached pursuant to this article.

(B) With respect to a security interest, the collateral subject to a security interest pursuant to Division 9
 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code.

(C) With respect to an agricultural lien, the farm products subject to an agricultural lien pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code.

(4) “Purchase money security interest” has the same meaning as used in Section 9103 of the Commercial Code.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (d), (e), (g), and (h), priority between a judgment lien on personal property and a conflicting security interest or agricultural lien in the same personal property shall be determined according to this subdivision. Conflicting interests rank according to priority in time of filing or perfection. In the case of a judgment lien, priority dates from the time filing is first made covering the personal property. In the case of a security interest or
 agricultural lien, priority dates from the earlier of the time a filing is first made covering the personal property or the time the security interest or agricultural lien is first perfected, if there is no period thereafter when there is neither filing nor perfection.

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (b), a date of filing or perfection as to personal property is also a date of filing or perfection as to proceeds.

(d) A purchase money security interest has priority over a conflicting judgment lien on the same personal property or its proceeds if the purchase money security interest is perfected at the time the judgment debtor, as a debtor under the security agreement, receives possession of the personal property or within 20 days thereafter.

(e) If a purchase money security interest in inventory has priority over
 a judgment lien pursuant to subdivision (d) and a conflicting security interest has priority over the purchase money security interest in the same inventory pursuant to Section 9324 of the Commercial Code, the conflicting security interest also has priority over the judgment lien on the inventory subject to the purchase money security interest, notwithstanding that the conflicting security interest would not otherwise have priority over the judgment lien.

(f) A judgment lien that has attached to personal property, and that is also subordinate under subdivision (b) to a security interest in the same personal property, is subordinate to the security interest only to the extent that the security interest secures advances made before the judgment lien attached or within 45 days thereafter or made without knowledge of the judgment lien or pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the judgment lien. For the purpose of this
 subdivision, a secured party shall be deemed not to have knowledge of a judgment lien on personal property until (1) the judgment creditor serves a copy of the notice of judgment lien on the secured party personally or by mail and (2) the secured party has knowledge of the judgment lien on personal property, as “knowledge” is defined in Section 1201 of the Commercial Code. If service on the secured party is by mail, it shall be sent to the secured party at the address shown in the financing statement or security agreement.

(g) A perfected agricultural lien on personal property has priority over a judgment lien on the same personal property if the statute creating the agricultural lien so provides.

(h) A security interest in personal property perfected by the filing of a financing statement under the law of a jurisdiction other than this state, or perfected by another method
 pursuant to the law of a jurisdiction other than this state, has priority over a judgment lien in the same personal property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 153, Sec. 2.   (AB 1549)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

697.600.

(a) A judgment lien on personal property has priority over any other judgment lien thereafter created on the property.

(b) For the purpose of this section, if two or more judgment liens attach to after-acquired property at the same time under subdivision (b) of Section 697.530, the judgment lien first filed has priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

697.610.

Except as provided in Sections 9617 and 9622 of the Commercial Code, a judgment lien on personal property continues notwithstanding the sale, exchange, or other disposition of the property, unless the person receiving the property is one of the following:

(a) A buyer in ordinary course of business (as defined in Section 1201 of the Commercial Code) who, under Section 9320 of the Commercial Code, would take free of a security interest created by the seller.

(b) A lessee in ordinary course of business (as defined in paragraph (15) of subdivision (a) of Section 10103 of the Commercial Code) who, under Section 9321 of the Commercial Code, would take free of a security interest created by the lessor.

(c) A holder to whom a negotiable document of title has been duly negotiated within the meaning of Section 7501 of the Commercial Code.

(d) A purchaser of chattel paper who, under Section 9330 of the Commercial Code, would have priority over another security interest in the chattel paper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

697.620.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Cash proceeds” means money, checks, deposit accounts, and the like.

(2) “Proceeds” means identifiable cash proceeds received upon the sale, exchange, collection, or other disposition of property subject to a judgment lien on personal property.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the judgment lien on personal property continues in the proceeds with the same priority.

(c) In the event of insolvency proceedings (as defined in Section 1201 of the Commercial Code) instituted by or against the judgment debtor, the judgment lien continues under subdivision (b) only in the following proceeds:

(1) Proceeds in a separate deposit account containing only proceeds.

(2) Proceeds in the form of money which are neither commingled with other money nor deposited in a deposit account prior to the insolvency proceedings.

(3) Proceeds in the form of checks and the like which are not deposited in a deposit account prior to the insolvency proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

697.640.

(a) The judgment creditor, judgment debtor, owner of property subject to a judgment lien on personal property created under the judgment, or a person having a security interest in or a lien on the property subject to the judgment lien, may file in the office of the Secretary of State an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment executed as provided in Section 724.060 or a court clerk’s certificate of satisfaction of judgment issued pursuant to Section 724.100, together with a statement containing the name
 of the judgment creditor, the name and address of the judgment debtor, and the file number of the notice of judgment lien. Upon such filing, the judgment lien created under the judgment that has been satisfied is extinguished as a matter of record. The fee for filing the acknowledgment or certificate is the same as the fee for filing a termination statement under Section 9404 of the Commercial Code.

(b) The filing officer shall treat an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment, or court clerk’s certificate of satisfaction of judgment, and statement filed pursuant to this section in the same manner as a termination statement filed pursuant to Section 9525 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

697.650.

(a) The judgment creditor may by a writing do any of the following:

(1) Release the judgment lien on all the personal property subject to the lien of a sole judgment debtor or of all the judgment debtors.

(2) If the notice of judgment lien names more than one judgment debtor, release the judgment lien on all the personal property subject to the lien of one or more but of less
 than all the judgment debtors.

(3) Release the judgment lien on all or a part of the personal property subject to the lien.

(4) Subordinate to a security interest or other lien or encumbrance the judgment lien on all or a part of the personal property subject to the judgment lien.

(b) A statement of release or subordination is sufficient if it is signed by the judgment creditor and contains the name and address of the judgment debtor, the file number of the notice of judgment lien, and wording appropriate to bring the statement within one of the paragraphs of subdivision (a). In the case of a release under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the statement of release shall also describe the property being released. In the case of a subordination under paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), the statement of subordination
 shall also describe the property on which the judgment lien is being subordinated and describe the security interest or other lien or encumbrance to which the judgment lien is being subordinated.

(c) The filing officer shall treat the filing of a statement of release pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of this section in the same manner as a termination statement filed pursuant to Sections 9513 and 9519 of the Commercial Code. The filing officer shall treat the filing of a statement of release pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of this section in the same manner as a comparable amendment filed pursuant to Sections 9512 and 9519 of the Commercial Code. The filing officer shall treat the filing of a statement of release pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of this section and the filing of a statement of subordination filed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of this section in the same manner as a statement of
 release filed pursuant to Sections 9512 and 9519 of the Commercial Code.

(d) The fee for filing the statement is the same as that provided in Section 9525 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

697.660.

(a)If a notice of judgment lien on personal property filed in the office of the Secretary of State appears to create a judgment lien on personal property of a person who is not the judgment debtor because the name of the property owner is the same as or similar to that of the judgment debtor, the erroneously identified property owner or a person having a security interest in or a lien on the property may deliver to the judgment creditor a written demand that the judgment creditor file in the office of
 the Secretary of State a statement releasing the lien as to the property of such owner. The demand shall be accompanied by proof to the satisfaction of the judgment creditor that the property owner is not the judgment debtor and that the property is not subject to enforcement of the judgment against the judgment debtor.

(b) Within 15 days after receipt of the demand and proof satisfactory to the judgment creditor that the property owner is not the judgment debtor and that the property is not subject to enforcement of the judgment, the judgment creditor shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a statement releasing the lien on the property of such owner. If the judgment creditor improperly fails to file the statement of release within the time allowed, the judgment creditor is liable to the person who made the demand for all damages sustained by reason of such failure and shall also forfeit one hundred dollars ($100) to such
 person.

(c) If the judgment creditor does not file a statement of release pursuant to subdivision (b), the person who made the demand may apply to the court on noticed motion for an order releasing the judgment lien on the property of such owner. Notice of motion shall be served on the judgment creditor. Service shall be made personally or by mail. Upon presentation of evidence to the satisfaction of the court that the property owner is not the judgment debtor and that the property is not subject to enforcement of the judgment, the court shall order the judgment creditor to prepare and file the statement of release or shall itself order the release of the judgment lien on the property of such owner. The court order may be filed in the office of the Secretary of State with the same effect as the statement of release demanded under subdivision (a).

(d) The court shall award
 reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party in any action or proceeding maintained pursuant to this section.

(e) The damages provided by this section are not in derogation of any other damages or penalties to which an aggrieved person may be entitled by law.

(f) The fee for filing a statement of release or court order under this section is the same as that provided in Section 9525 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 21.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

697.670.

(a) The Secretary of State may prescribe, provided that a cost-savings would be achieved thereby:

(1) The forms for the notice of judgment lien on personal property and the statement of continuation, release, or subordination provided for in this article.

(2) The form
 for the statement provided for in Section 697.640 and the situations when that form is required or is not required.

(b) A form prescribed by the Secretary of State for a notice or statement pursuant to subdivision (a) is deemed to comply with this article and supersedes any requirements specified in this article for the notice or statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (AB 121)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

697.680.

(a) A judgment creditor may apply to the court for an order reinstating a released lien on personal property and its priority at the time of cancellation. Subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), the court shall order the reinstatement of a lien with the same priority that it held at the time of cancellation. Upon entry of the order the clerk shall do the following:

(1) Note in the court’s records that the judgment is no longer satisfied to the extent of the returned funds or property.

(2) Issue to the judgment creditor a certificate and notice of reinstatement of judgment lien. The certificate of reinstatement of judgment lien shall identify the judgment and parties, the unsatisfied
 judgment amount, and the filing number and date of the original notice of judgment lien filed with the Secretary of State.

(b) (1) The application for reinstatement of a lien under subdivision (a) shall be filed with a declaration by the judgment creditor that includes and certifies all of the following:

(A) The title of the court, the case name and number, and the date and amount of the original judgment and any renewals thereof.

(B) A statement that the judgment creditor released a lien or liens in the reasonable belief that the money judgment was satisfied. This statement shall include:

(i) Information sufficient to identify the liens that were released, including the county or counties in which an abstract of judgment was
 recorded, the recording dates and numbers of those recordings and, if applicable, the filing date and number of any notice of judgment lien on personal property that was filed with the Secretary of State.

(ii) The details of any acknowledgment of full or partial satisfaction of judgment that was filed or entered as a result of the prior application of funds, including the date, county, and recording number of any acknowledgment of full or partial satisfaction of judgment recorded by the judgment creditor.

(C) A statement that after a lien was released, the judgment creditor was ordered pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 703.580 to return to the judgment debtor property levied or wages garnished in satisfaction of the money judgment. A copy of the order shall be attached as an exhibit to the declaration.

(D) A statement that the judgment creditor returned, and the judgment debtor received, all property and wages ordered returned.

(E) A statement that but for the court’s order pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 703.580, the money judgment would have been fully satisfied or that the property returned to the judgment creditor was identified in a recorded acknowledgment of full or partial satisfaction of judgment.

(F) A statement that the judgment creditor is not appealing the order to return funds pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 703.580.

(2) knowingly providing false information shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount up to $1,500

(c) (1) The judgment creditor shall serve upon the judgment debtor by first-class mail to the address verified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 684.130 a copy of the application for an order reinstating a released lien.

(2) The judgment debtor may, within 15 days of service of the application, file a declaration stating that the funds or property identified by the judgment debtor pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) have not been returned.

(3) If a declaration under paragraph (2) is filed, the court shall deny the application and the judgment creditor shall file a noticed motion to be heard by the court in order to reinstate a lien and its priority.

(4) If no objection is filed, the clerk’s reinstatement of the lien and its priority shall be automatically
 effective.

(d) An application under this section shall be filed in the action in which the judgment creditor was ordered, pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 703.580, to return to the judgment debtor property levied or wages garnished in satisfaction of the money judgment.

(e) Attorney’s fees are not recoverable under this section.

(f) The judgment creditor may record the certificate in the same manner as an abstract of judgment, and that recordation shall have the effect of restoring the lien’s priority as if the prior release or satisfaction had not occurred.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 708, Sec. 3.   (AB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Execution Lien [697.710. - 697.750.]

697.710.

A levy on property under a writ of execution creates an execution lien on the property from the time of levy until the expiration of two years after the date of issuance of the writ unless the judgment is sooner satisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

697.720.

Subject to Section 701.630, if an interest in real property subject to an execution lien is transferred or encumbered, the interest transferred or encumbered remains subject to the lien after the transfer or encumbrance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

697.730.

(a) Subject to Section 701.630 and except as provided in subdivision (b), if tangible personal property subject to an execution lien is in the custody of a levying officer and is transferred or encumbered, the property remains subject to the lien after the transfer or encumbrance.

(b) If a levy upon tangible personal property of a going business is made by the levying officer placing a keeper in charge of the business, a purchaser or lessee
 of property subject to the execution lien takes the property free of the execution lien if the purchaser or lessee is one of the following:

(1) A buyer in ordinary course of business (as defined in Section 1201 of the Commercial Code) who, under Section 9320 of the Commercial Code, would take free of a security interest created by his or her seller.

(2) A lessee in ordinary course of business (as defined in paragraph (15) of subdivision (a) of Section 10103 of the Commercial Code) who, under Section 9321 of the Commercial Code, would take free of a security interest created by the lessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

697.740.

Except as provided in Sections 9617 and 9622 of the Commercial Code and in Section 701.630, if personal property subject to an execution lien is not in the custody of a levying officer and the property is transferred or encumbered, the property remains subject to the lien after the transfer or encumbrance except where the transfer or encumbrance is made to one of the following persons:

(a) A person who acquires an interest in the property under the law of this
 state for reasonably equivalent value without knowledge of the lien. For purposes of this subdivision, value is given for a transfer or encumbrance if, in exchange for the transfer or encumbrance, property is transferred or an antecedent debt is secured or satisfied.

(b) A buyer in ordinary course of business (as defined in Section 1201 of the Commercial Code) who, under Section 9320 of the Commercial Code, would take free of a security interest created by the seller or encumbrancer.

(c) A lessee in ordinary course of business (as defined in paragraph (15) of subdivision (a) of Section 10103 of the Commercial Code) or a licensee in the ordinary course of business (as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 9321 of the Commercial Code) who, under Section 9321 of the Commercial Code, would take free of a security interest created by the lessor or the licensor.

(d) A holder in due course (as defined in Section 3302 of the Commercial Code) of a negotiable instrument within the meaning of Section 3104 of the Commercial Code.

(e) A holder to whom a negotiable document of title has been duly negotiated within the meaning of Section 7501 of the Commercial Code.

(f) A protected purchaser (as defined in Section 8303 of the Commercial Code) of a security or a person entitled to the benefits of Section 8502 or 8510 of the Commercial Code.

(g) A purchaser of chattel paper who gives new value and takes possession of the chattel paper in good faith and in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business or a purchaser of an instrument who gives value and takes possession of the instrument in good faith.

(h) A holder of a purchase money security interest (as defined in Section 9103 of the Commercial Code).

(i) A collecting bank holding a security interest in items being collected, accompanying documents and proceeds, pursuant to Section 4210 of the Commercial Code.

(j) A person who acquires any right or interest in letters of credit, advices of credit, or money.

(k) A person who acquires any right or interest in property subject to a certificate of title statute of another jurisdiction under the law of which indication of a security interest on the certificate of title is required as a condition of perfection of the security interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

697.750.

Notwithstanding Section 697.740, except as provided in Section 9617 of the Commercial Code and in Section 701.630, if (1) growing crops, (2) timber to be cut, or (3) minerals or the like (including oil or gas) to be extracted or accounts receivable resulting from the sale thereof at wellhead or minehead are subject to an execution lien and are transferred or encumbered, the property remains subject to the execution lien after the transfer or encumbrance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 23.1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Other Liens Created by Enforcement Process [697.910. - 697.920.]

697.910.

This article applies to liens created by any of the following:

(a) An examination proceeding as provided in Section 708.110, 708.120, or 708.205.

(b) A creditor’s suit as provided in Section 708.250.

(c) A charging order as provided in Section 708.320.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

697.920.

Except as provided in Section 9617 of the Commercial Code and in Section 701.630, a lien described in Section 697.910 continues on property subject to the lien, notwithstanding the transfer or encumbrance of the property subject to the lien, unless the transfer or encumbrance is made to a person listed in Section 697.740.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 23.2.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Execution [699.010. - 701.830.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [699.010. - 699.090.]

699.010.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, this chapter governs enforcement of a money judgment by a writ of execution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

699.020.

At any time after delivery of a writ of execution to a levying officer and before its return, a person indebted to the judgment debtor may pay to the levying officer the amount of the debt or so much thereof as is necessary to satisfy the money judgment. The levying officer shall give a receipt for the amount paid and such receipt is a discharge for the amount paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

699.030.

If personal property sought to be levied upon is located in a private place of the judgment debtor:

(a) The levying officer making the levy shall demand delivery of the property by the judgment debtor and shall advise the judgment debtor that the judgment debtor may be liable for costs and attorney’s fees incurred in any further proceedings to obtain delivery of the property. If the judgment debtor does not deliver the property, the levying officer shall make no further effort to obtain custody of the property and shall promptly notify the judgment creditor of the failure to obtain
 custody of the property.

(b) The judgment creditor may apply to the court ex parte, or on noticed motion if the court so directs or a court rule so requires, for an order directing the levying officer to seize the property in the private place. The application may be made whether or not a writ has been issued and whether or not demand has been made pursuant to subdivision (a). The application for the order shall describe with particularity both the property sought to be levied upon, and the place where it is to be found, according to the best knowledge, information, and belief of the judgment creditor. The court may not issue the order unless the judgment creditor establishes that there is probable cause to believe that property sought to be levied upon is located in the place described. The levying officer making the levy, at the time delivery of the property pursuant to the order is demanded, shall announce his or her identity, purpose, and
 authority. If the property is not voluntarily delivered, the levying officer may cause the building or enclosure where the property is believed to be located to be broken open in such manner as the levying officer reasonably believes will cause the least damage, but if the levying officer reasonably believes that entry and seizure of the property will involve a substantial risk of death or serious bodily harm to any person, the levying officer shall refrain from entering and shall promptly make a return to the court setting forth the reasons for believing that the risk exists. In such a case, the court shall make such orders as may be appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

699.040.

(a)If a writ of execution is issued, the judgment creditor may apply to the court ex parte, or on noticed motion if the court so directs or a court rule so requires, for an order directing the judgment debtor to transfer to the levying officer either or both of the following:

(1) Possession of the property sought to be levied upon if the property is sought to be levied upon by taking it into custody.

(2) Possession of documentary evidence of title to property of or a debt owed to the judgment debtor
 that is sought to be levied upon. An order pursuant to this paragraph may be served when the property or debt is levied upon or thereafter.

(b) The court may issue an order pursuant to this section upon a showing of need for the order.

(c) The order shall be personally served on the judgment debtor and shall contain a notice to the judgment debtor that failure to comply with the order may subject the judgment debtor to arrest and punishment for contempt of court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

699.060.

(a)The levying officer shall release property levied upon when the levying officer receives a written direction to release the property from the judgment creditor’s attorney of record or, if the judgment creditor does not have an attorney of record, from the judgment creditor, or when the levying officer receives a certified copy of a court order for release, or when otherwise required to release
 the property. The release shall include the signature and name of the attorney or judgment creditor issuing the release. The release extinguishes any execution lien or attachment lien in favor of the judgment creditor on the property released.
